tests/apertium/test_files/apertium-go-od.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜÚāàáâäçèéêëìíîïīñòóôöõùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz0123456789ş</alphabet>
  <pardefs>

<pardef n="zero__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

  </pardefs>
</dictionary>
